Massachusetts, session 194th, H5451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Marion may grant an additional license for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to 
C & J Sull LLC, d/b/a J. Sull Wine, located at 119 Wareham Road, Unit 105, in the town of 
Marion. The license granted pursuant to this section shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 
except said section 17. 
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted under this 
section to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location 
if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a 
letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good 
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been 
paid. 

of 2 13  (c) If the licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any 
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of 
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority which 
may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same 
location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall 
dissolve. 
(d) The license granted under this section shall be issued within 1 year after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter. 
SECTION 2.  Upon issuance of the license authorized in section 1, the licensee shall 
return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the 
licensing authority, its license for the sale of wine and malt beverages not to be drunk on the 
premises under section 15 of chapter 138. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.